Missouri, session 2026, SB957.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
nine new sections, to be known as sections 324.950, 324.953,
324.956, 324.959, 324.962, 324.965, 324.968, 324.971, and
324.974, to read as follows:
324.950. 1. The provisions of sections 324.950 to
324.974 shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Statewide Mechanical Contractor Licensing Act" and shall not
be affected by the provisions of section 324.009. The
provisions of sections 324.950 to 324.974 shall not be
construed to affect the provisions of chapter 341.
2. As used in sections 324.950 to 324.974, unless the
context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Apprentice", a person who holds a valid statewide
mechanical apprentice license to perform mechanical work
for, and under the direct supervision of, a journeyman;
(2) "Contractor", a person who holds a valid statewide
mechanical contractor license and who is employed by a
corporation, firm, institution, organization, or company to

SB 957 2
perform mechanical work and directly supervise the
performance of mechanical work by journeymen;
(3) "Division", the division of professional
registration within the department of commerce and insurance;
(4) "Journeyman", a person who holds a valid statewide
mechanical journeyman license to perform mechanical work
for, and under the supervision of and inspection of, a
contractor, and to supervise and inspect the mechanical work
of an apprentice;
(5) "Local license", a license issued by a political
subdivision and valid only in that political subdivision
that is required to bid, accept, or perform mechanical work;
(6) "Mechanical work", work per the International Code
Council, International Association of Plumbing and
Mechanical Officials, 30 CSR 20, or the National Fire
Protection Association (NFPA) 99.
(a) The term "mechanical work" shall include the
design, installation, maintenance, construction, alteration,
repair, and inspection of any:
a. HVAC system and associated appurtenances;
b. HVAC duct system and associated appurtenances;
c. Exhaust systems and associated appurtenances;
d. Combustion air or make-up air and associated
appurtenances;
e. Chimneys and vents and associated appurtenances,
excluding those regulated by local ordinances as such
existed on April 18, 2023;
f. Hydronic piping systems and associated
appurtenances that are part of an HVAC system;
g. Boilers, water heaters that are one hundred twenty
gallons and above, or two hundred thousand British thermal
units (BTUs) and above, and pressure vessels and associated

SB 957 3
appurtenances, excluding those covered by a nationally
standardized plumbing code, those regulated by local
ordinances as such existed on April 18, 2023, or those used
for potable water systems;
h. Process piping systems and associated appurtenances;
i. Fuel gas distribution piping and associated
appurtenances, excluding those regulated by local ordinances
as such existed on April 18, 2023;
j. Fuel oil-fired and solid fuel appliances and
associated appurtenances, excluding those covered by a
nationally standardized plumbing code or local ordinances
promulgated by a political subdivision of this state as such
ordinances existed on April 18, 2023;
k. Fuel oil piping and storage vessels and associated
appurtenances;
l. Fuel oil-fired and solid fuel appliance venting
systems and associated appurtenances;
m. Equipment and appliances intended to utilize solar
energy for space heating or cooling together with associated
appurtenances;
n. Process heating and associated appurtenances;
o. Refrigeration systems, including all equipment and
components thereof and associated appurtenances;
p. Nonmedical air, nonmedical oxygen, and nonmedical
vacuum piping for mechanical equipment and associated
appurtenances, excluding work covered by a nationally
standardized plumbing code;
q. Liquefied petroleum gas distribution piping and
associated appurtenances, excluding work covered by a
nationally standardized liquefied petroleum gas code,
national fuel gas code, and nationally standardized plumbing

SB 957 4
codes, or local ordinances as such ordinances existed on
April 18, 2023;
r. Biogas, biodiesel, hydrogen processing systems, and
ethanol distribution and associated appurtenances;
s. Chillers, cooling towers, and associated support
steel and appurtenances for cooling towers;
t. Petroleum piping and venting together with
associated equipment and associated appurtenances, pumps,
and tanks governed by NFPA 30 and 30a;
u. All fuel and petroleum pipelines, piping, and
associated pumping stations with associated equipment and
appurtenances; and
v. All associated equipment and facilities related to
subparagraphs a. to u. of this paragraph.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision
to the contrary, the term "mechanical work" shall not
include, and the provisions of sections 324.950 to 324.974
shall not apply to, the design, installation, maintenance,
construction, alteration, repair, or inspection of any:
a. Solid-fuel or gas-fueled hearth appliance,
including, but not limited to, wood stoves and fireplaces,
100 manufacturer-specified venting systems, fireplace chimneys,
101 outdoor cooking appliances with manufacturer-specified
102 venting systems, outdoor fireplaces, or outdoor fire pits;
103 b. Propane-related equipment for which certification
104 is required by any regulation adopted under subdivision (3)
105 of subsection 13 of section 323.025; or
106 c. Fire sprinkler or suppression systems and
107 associated appurtenances.
108 Additional certification may be required by the division for
109 a particular scope of mechanical work;

SB 957 5
110 (7) "Residential work", service-related and
111 replacement-related mechanical work in an existing domicile
112 for or on behalf of the individual owners or renters
113 occupying:
114 (a) Single-family houses;
115 (b) An individual dwelling unit in a duplex, triplex,
116 or fourplex; or
117 (c) An individual dwelling unit in an apartment
118 building containing five or more apartments.
119 The term "residential work" shall not include new
120 construction or work required for a building or structure as
121 a whole that services more than one dwelling unit;
122 (8) "Statewide mechanical apprentice license", a valid
123 license issued by the division to an apprentice to
124 physically perform mechanical work under the direct
125 supervision and inspection of a journeyman;
126 (9) "Statewide mechanical contractor license", a valid
127 license issued by the division to a contractor to bid and
128 accept mechanical work in any political subdivision
129 regardless of local requirements to bid and accept
130 mechanical work, to physically perform mechanical work, and
131 to directly supervise and inspect the mechanical work of a
132 journeyman;
133 (10) "Statewide mechanical journeyman license", a
134 valid license issued by the division to a journeyman to
135 physically perform mechanical work under the supervision and
136 inspection of a contractor and to directly supervise and
137 inspect the mechanical work of an apprentice.
324.953. 1. The division shall adopt, implement,
rescind, amend, and administer such rules as may be

SB 957 6
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 324.950 to
324.974, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Training, education, and experience requirements
for licensure under sections 324.950 to 324.974;
(2) Application forms and fees;
(3) Professional education units for license renewal
and approval of professional education programs;
(4) Renewal dates, notifications of renewal, and
renewal applications and fees;
(5) Inactive licenses and reinstatement procedures; and
(6) Professional conduct and ethical standards of
business practice for licensees.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. For the purpose of sections 324.950 to 324.974, the
division shall:
(1) Employ, within the limits of the appropriations
for such purpose, employees as are necessary to carry out
the provisions of sections 324.950 to 324.974;
(2) Exercise all administrative functions;

SB 957 7
(3) Establish all applicable fees, set at an amount
that shall not substantially exceed the cost of
administering sections 324.950 to 324.974;
(4) Deposit all fees collected by transmitting such
funds to the department of revenue for deposit to the state
treasury to the credit of the Missouri mechanical contractor
licensing fund established under section 324.956;
(5) Enter into agreements with the boiler and pressure
vessel safety unit within the division of fire safety of the
department of public safety to investigate complaints
against a licensee from persons who receive services from
the licensee and for the submission of a report to the
division of such investigation, provided that the division
shall retain the authority to institute any enforcement
action against a licensee as a result of an investigation
under this subdivision. Nothing in this subdivision shall
be construed to prevent the boiler and pressure vessel
safety unit from reporting a violation of sections 324.950
to 324.974 found during a routine inspection to the
division; and
(6) Institute actions to enforce compliance with the
provisions of sections 324.950 to 324.974.
3. No new licensing activity assigned to the division
under sections 324.950 to 324.974 shall become effective
until the initial rules filed under this section have become
effective.
324.956. There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Missouri Mechanical Contractor Licensing Fund", which
shall consist of moneys collected under sections 324.950 to
324.974. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund
and may approve disbursements from the fund in accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180. Upon appropriation, moneys

SB 957 8
in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of
sections 324.950 to 324.974. The provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, moneys in this fund
shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of general
revenue until the amount in the fund at the end of the
biennium exceeds three times the amount of the appropriation
from the fund for the preceding fiscal year. The amount, if
any, in the fund that shall lapse is that amount in the fund
that exceeds the appropriate multiple of the appropriations
from the fund for the preceding fiscal year. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
324.959. The provisions of sections 324.950 to 324.974
shall not apply to mechanical work, including residential
work, performed in any county with more than two hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand
inhabitants, any county with more than fifty thousand but
fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than ten thousand but fewer than twelve thousand
six hundred inhabitants, or any county with more than one
hundred twenty thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty
thousand inhabitants, or any political subdivision contained
within such counties.
324.962. 1. The applicant for a statewide mechanical
contractor license shall have:
(1) Completed the application form provided by the
division and paid any applicable application fees;
(2) Provided proof of liability insurance in the
amount of one million dollars and posted bond with each
political subdivision in which he or she will perform work,
as required by that political subdivision; and

SB 957 9
(3) Completed the educational, training, and
experience requirements equal to or greater than that of a
contractor's license, as such existed on April 18, 2023, in
the mechanical code or ordinance of any county with more
than one million inhabitants.
2. The applicant for a statewide mechanical journeyman
license shall have:
(1) Completed the application form provided by the
division and paid any applicable application fees; and
(2) Completed the educational, training, and
experience requirements equal to or greater than that of a
journeyman license, as such existed on April 18, 2023, in
the mechanical code or ordinance of any county with more
than one million inhabitants.
3. The applicant for a statewide mechanical apprentice
license shall have:
(1) Completed the application form provided by the
division and pay any applicable application fees; and
(2) Completed the educational, training, and
experience requirements equal to or greater than that of an
apprentice license, as such existed on April 18, 2023, in
the mechanical code or ordinance of any county with more
than one million inhabitants.
324.965. 1. Any corporation, firm, institution,
organization, company, or representative thereof engaging in
mechanical work in a political subdivision that requires a
local license in order to perform such work shall:
(1) Have in its employ, at a supervisory level, at
least one statewide mechanical contractor licensee, or an
equivalent local licensee. A statewide mechanical
contractor licensee shall represent only one firm, company,
corporation, institution, or organization at one time;

SB 957 10
(2) For purposes of performing residential work, have
either a statewide mechanical contractor licensee or a
statewide mechanical journeyman licensee to perform, direct,
inspect, or supervise the work, or the equivalent local
licensee; and
(3) For all other mechanical work, have at least one
statewide mechanical journeyman licensee on site for every
statewide mechanical apprentice licensee performing the
work, or the equivalent local licensee.
2. Any person performing mechanical work in a
political subdivision that does not require the person to
hold a local license, or any person who possesses such local
license, shall not be required to obtain or possess a
statewide license under sections 324.950 to 324.974 to
perform mechanical work in such political subdivision.
3. (1) Political subdivisions shall not be prohibited
from establishing their own mechanical contractor,
journeyman, or apprentice licenses, but shall recognize a
statewide license in lieu of the equivalent local license
for the purpose of performing mechanical work in such
political subdivision. A statewide licensee under sections
324.950 to 324.974 shall be deemed eligible to perform
mechanical work and to obtain permits to perform such work
from any political subdivision in this state commensurate
with the corresponding local license.
(2) Nothing in sections 324.950 to 324.974 shall be
construed to prohibit a political subdivision from enforcing
any of the political subdivision's codes, ordinances, or
laws; inspecting the work of licensees; or reporting
suspected violations of sections 324.950 to 324.974 to the
division for investigation of the licensee.

SB 957 11
4. (1) If a political subdivision does not recognize
a statewide license in lieu of an equivalent local license
for the purposes of performing mechanical work or obtaining
permits to perform mechanical work within the political
subdivision, then a statewide licensee may file a complaint
with the division.
(2) The division shall perform an investigation into
the complaint, and if the division finds that the political
subdivision failed to recognize a statewide license in
accordance with the provisions of this section, then the
division shall notify the political subdivision that the
political subdivision has violated the provisions of this
section and has thirty days to comply with the law.
(3) If, after thirty days of notification by the
division, the political subdivision continues to refuse or
fail to recognize a statewide license, then the division
shall notify the director of the department of revenue, who
shall withhold any moneys that the noncompliant political
subdivision would otherwise be entitled to from local sales
tax, as defined in section 32.085, until the director has
received notice from the division that the political
subdivision is in compliance with this section.
(4) When the political subdivision becomes compliant
with the provisions of this section, the division shall
notify the director of the department of revenue who shall
disburse all funds held under this subsection. Moneys held
by the director of the department of revenue under this
subsection shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall
not be commingled with any funds of the state.
324.968. Licenses issued under sections 324.950 to
324.974 shall expire on a renewal date established in rule
by the division. The term of licensure shall be three

SB 957 12
years. The division shall mail a renewal notice prior to
the renewal date. Professional education units needed for
license renewal, as well as procedures involving inactive
licenses and reinstatement of licenses, shall be equal to
those in the mechanical code or ordinance, as such existed
on April 18, 2023, of any county with more than one million
inhabitants.
324.971. 1. The division may refuse to issue or renew
or may suspend any license under sections 324.950 to 324.974
for one or any combination of causes stated in subsection 3
of this section. The division shall notify the applicant in
writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall advise the
applicant of his or her right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The division shall publish via electronic media and
update on a weekly basis a list of valid statewide
mechanical contractor licensees under sections 324.950 to
324.974, a list of current enforcement actions against such
licensees, and the procedures for filing grievances against
any statewide mechanical contractor, mechanical journeyman,
and mechanical apprentice licensees.
3. The division may cause a complaint to be filed with
the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter
621 against any licensee under sections 324.950 to 324.974
or any person who has failed to renew or has surrendered his
or her license for any one or any combination of the
following causes:
(1) The final adjudication and finding of guilty, or
the entering of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, in a
criminal prosecution under the laws of any state, of the
United States, or of any country, for any offense reasonably
related to the qualifications, duties, and responsibilities

SB 957 13
of a licensee under sections 324.950 to 324.974 for any
offense an essential element of which is fraud, dishonesty,
or an act of violence;
(2) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or
bribery in securing any license issued under sections
324.950 to 324.974 or in obtaining permission to take any
examination given or required under sections 324.950 to
324.974;
(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition, or other compensation by fraud, deception, or
misrepresentation;
(4) Incompetence, misconduct, gross negligence, fraud,
misrepresentation, or dishonesty in the performance of the
functions and duties of any profession licensed or regulated
under sections 324.950 to 324.974;
(5) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person
to violate, any provision of sections 324.950 to 324.974 or
any lawful rule adopted under sections 324.950 to 324.974;
(6) Impersonation of any person holding a license or
allowing any person to use his or her license;
(7) Final adjudication of a person as incompetent by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(8) Assisting or enabling any person to practice, or
offer to practice, any profession licensed or regulated
under sections 324.950 to 324.974 who is not licensed and
currently eligible to practice under sections 324.950 to
324.974 or who does not possess an active equivalent local
license if required by a political subdivision; or
(9) Issuance of a license based upon a material
mistake of fact.
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings
shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of

SB 957 14
chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative hearing
commission that the grounds provided in subsection 3 of this
section for disciplinary action are met, the division may,
singly or in combination, censure or place the person named
in the complaint on probation with such terms and conditions
as the division deems appropriate for a period not to exceed
five years, or may suspend, for a period not to exceed three
years, or revoke the license.
5. An individual whose license has been revoked shall
wait at least one year from the date of revocation to apply
for relicensure. Relicensure shall be at the discretion of
the division after compliance with all requirements of
sections 324.950 to 324.974 relative to the previous
licensing of the applicant.
324.974. 1. Any person who knowingly violates any
provision of sections 324.950 to 324.974 is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
2. Any officer or agent of a corporation or member or
agent of a partnership or association who knowingly and
personally participates in or is an accessory to any
violation of sections 324.950 to 324.974 is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
3. The division may cause a complaint to be filed for
any violation of sections 324.950 to 324.974 in any court of
competent jurisdiction and perform such other acts as may be
necessary to enforce the provisions of sections 324.950 to
324.974.
✓